Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201172-1255
Investment transactions; Auditor
of Public Accounts; postaudits; report.

The Auditor of Public
Accounts shall conduct, at
such time as he or she determines necessary, postaudits of the investment
transactions provided for in the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act and shall
submit annually a report of his or her findings to the Governor and the state
investment officer.

Laws 1969, c. 584, § 19, p. 2355;

Laws 1997, LB 4, § 4;

Laws 2011, LB337, § 5.
April 27, 2011